Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2287
Restitution; effect on civil action.

(1) Sections 29-2280 to 29-2289 shall not limit or impair the right of a victim to sue and recover damages from the defendant in a civil action.

(2) The findings in the sentencing hearing and the fact that restitution was required or paid shall not be admissible as evidence in a civil action and shall have no legal effect on the merits of a civil action.

(3) Any restitution paid by the defendant to the victim shall be set off against any judgment in favor of the victim in a civil action arising out of the facts or events which were the basis for the restitution. The court trying the civil action shall hold a separate hearing to determine the validity and amount of any setoff asserted by the defendant.

Laws 1986, LB 956, § 8.